District of Columbia statutes.
10-1121.06

Applicability of zoning and other laws.

Zoning laws and regulations and other laws and regulations applicable to the construction, use, and occupancy of buildings and premises, including building, electrical, plumbing, housing, health, and fire regulations, shall be applicable to structures constructed in airspace.

History

Oct. 17, 1968, 82 Stat. 1167, Pub. L. 90-598, § 7

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1036.
1973 Ed., § 7-946.